Rhode Island, session 2025, SB398.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 4-11 of the General Laws entitled "Psittacine Birds" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
4-11-14. Parrot sale restrictions.
(a) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) "Agricultural use" means birds, such as chickens or guinea fowl, that are raised as
livestock for personal or commercial use. Parrots cannot be classified as birds for agricultural use.
(2) "Animal care facility" means an animal control center or animal shelter, maintained by
or under contract with any state, county, or municipality, whose mission or practice is to protect
the welfare of animals and find placement for them in homes or animal rescue organizations.
(3) "Animal rescue organization" means a nonprofit organization whose mission and
practice is the rescue and placement of mammals, birds, reptiles, or amphibians into permanent
homes. These organizations cannot obtain any animal from a breeder or broker for payment or
compensation.
(4) "Broker" means a third party as defined in § 4-19-2.
(5) "Parrots" means any of the numerous widely distributed tropical birds belonging to the
order Psittaciformes.
(6) "Pet store" or "pet shop" means a retail establishment where animals are sold,
exchanged, bartered, or offered for sale to the general public. Such definition shall not include an
animal care facility or animal rescue organization as defined in this section. A person who sells or

otherwise transfers the offspring of animals they have bred on their residential premises shall not
be considered a "pet store" for purposes of this section.
(b) Prohibition of the sale of parrots at pet stores.
(1) It shall be unlawful for a pet store to sell or offer for sale a parrot from a breeder or
broker.
(2) A pet store may offer for sale parrots that are obtained from animal care facilities or
animal rescue organizations.
(3) The name of the animal care facility or rescue organization will be clearly displayed
next to enclosures when adoption events are held at pet stores.
(4) Pet stores shall have a one year grace period to sell parrots already in their possession
on the effective date of this section.
(c) Prohibition on sales in public places.
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to offer for sale, sell, exchange, or barter any parrots
on any roadside, park, other recreation area, outdoor market, or commercial or retail parking lot,
even if access is authorized by the property owner.
(2) This section shall not apply to the following:
(i) The display of birds as part of a state or county fair exhibition or for educational
programs. This exception does not apply to parrots and they cannot be displayed at fairs or used
for educational programs.
(ii) A bird sold or displayed for agricultural uses. This exception does not apply to parrots
and they cannot be classified as birds for agricultural use.
(d) Violation - Penalty.
Any person who sells a parrot in violation of this section shall be subject to a civil fine of
one thousand dollars ($1,000). Each unlawful sale or offer for sale will constitute a separate
violation. If a pet store acquires more parrots during the one-year grace period from a broker or
breeder, a civil fine of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) will be issued for each violation.
Violations shall be investigated and prosecuted by the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of
Cruelty to Animals.
(e) Implementation.
An advisory committee consisting of representatives from Foster Parrots, Ltd and Rhode
Island Parrot Rescue shall assist pet stores as they work to comply with subsection (b) of this
section. The committee will remain in effect for eighteen (18) months after the effective date of
this section and will issue an implementation status report at the end of its term.
(f) Severability.
LC001878 - Page 2 of 4

The invalidity of any subsection or provision of this section shall not invalidate any other
subsection or provision and the application of those subsections or provisions shall not be affected
and shall remain in full force and effect.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001878
========
LC001878 - Page 3 of 4